Massachusetts, session 194th, S2338.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 19E of Chapter 78 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
subsection (1) the following:-
(a) the Roslindale Branch of the Boston Public Library shall be named the "McGrory-
Roslindale Branch of the Boston Public Library" to honor Mary McGrory, a resident of
Roslindale and a Pulitzer Prize winning journalist".
of 1